tsts-nov19/apertium-tg-fa.tg.dix.xml
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>ман</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>ту</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
          <l>ӯ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <!-- him or her -->
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>вай</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>мо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>шумо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
          <l>онҳо</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Relative pronouns -->

    <pardef n="ки__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Determiners -->

    <pardef n="ин__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="дувум__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Find out what ~in means -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ин</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Proper Nouns -->

    <pardef n="Тоҷикистон__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__iza"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Фурӯғ__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__iza"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="китоб__n">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ҳо</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ҷамоҳир__n"> 			<!-- Arabic broken plurals -->
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="духтар__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>он</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="тракторчи__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ён</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="деҳ__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>от</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ширкаткунанда__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>гон</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="бузург__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тар</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тарин</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="русӣ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/></r>
	</p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="хушрӯ/й__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>й</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тар</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>тарин</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__izaORind"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="имрӯз__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="дар__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="pr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="ва__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="барои__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__на">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>на</l>
          <r>на<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="P__prefixes">
      <e>
        <par n="P__на"/>
        <p>
          <l>ме</l>
          <r>ме<s n="me"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="P__на"/>
        <p>
          <l>би</l>
          <r>би<s n="bi"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbs -->

    <e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="кӣ"><i>кӣ</i><par n="ки__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="ки"><i>ки</i><par n="ки__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="Молдова"><i>Молдова</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ҷазираҳои Соломон"><i>Ҷазираҳои<b/>Соломон</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Антигуаю Барбуда"><i>Антигуаю<b/>Барбуда</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Булғористон"><i>Булғористон</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Замбия"><i>Замбия</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Канада"><i>Канада</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Науру"><i>Науру</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Украина"><i>Украина</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Гавайӣ"><i>Гавайӣ</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Дакотаи_Шимолӣ"><i>Дакотаи_Шимолӣ</i><par n="Тоҷикистон__np"/></e>
    <e lm="аксбардорак"><i>аксбардорак</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="банк"><i>банк</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="вагон"><i>вагон</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="дар"><i>дар</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="журнал"><i>журнал</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="китобхона"><i>китобхона</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ойхоб"><i>ойхоб</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="таърих"><i>таърих</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷумҳури"><i>ҷумҳури</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="оғоз"><i>оғоз</i><par n="китоб__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷамоҳир"><i>ҷамоҳир</i><par n="ҷамоҳир__n"/></e>
    <e lm="амак"><i>амак</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="бародар"><i>бародар</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="деҳқон"><i>деҳқон</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="духтур"><i>духтур</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="корбар"><i>корбар</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="модар"><i>модар</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="президент"><i>президент</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="студент"><i>студент</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="химик"><i>химик</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="фармондеҳ"><i>фармондеҳ</i><par n="духтар__n"/></e>
    <e lm="диҳанда"><i>диҳанда</i><par n="ширкаткунанда__n"/></e>
    <e lm="овоздиҳанда"><i>овоздиҳанда</i><par n="ширкаткунанда__n"/></e>
    <e lm="хатмкунанда"><i>хатмкунанда</i><par n="ширкаткунанда__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ширкаткунанда"><i>ширкаткунанда</i><par n="ширкаткунанда__n"/></e>
    <e lm="гармидиҳанда"><i>гармидиҳанда</i><par n="ширкаткунанда__n"/></e>
    <e lm="колхозчи"><i>колхозчи</i><par n="тракторчи__n"/></e>
    <e lm="тракторчи"><i>тракторчи</i><par n="тракторчи__n"/></e>
    <e lm="деҳ"><i>деҳ</i><par n="деҳ__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аз"><i>аз</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ба"><i>ба</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бар"><i>бар</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бе"><i>бе</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="бо"><i>бо</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="дар"><i>дар</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="чун"><i>чун</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="то"><i>то</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="барои"><i>барои</i><par n="дар__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ин"><i>ин</i><par n="ин__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳамин"><i>ҳамин</i><par n="ин__det"/></e>
    <e lm="он"><i>он</i><par n="ин__det"/></e>
    <e lm="дувум"><i>дувум</i><par n="дувум__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ва"><i>ва</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ё"><i>ё</i><par n="ва__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="барои"><i>барои</i><par n="барои__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳам"><i>ҳам</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="акнун"><i>акнун</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="албатта"><i>албатта</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="инҷо"><i>инҷо</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="аммо"><i>аммо</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="бештар"><i>бештар</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="тақрибан"><i>тақрибан</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="баъд аз"><i>баъд<b/>аз</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="то кунун"><i>то<b/>кунун</i><par n="имрӯз__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="баланд"><i>баланд</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="беш"><i>беш</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="беҳ"><i>беҳ</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бузург"><i>бузург</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="дур"><i>дур</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="зебо"><i>зебо</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="калон"><i>калон</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="нав"><i>нав</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="озод"><i>озод</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="шавқовар"><i>шавқовар</i><par n="бузург__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="хушрӯй"><i>хушрӯ</i><par n="хушрӯ/й__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="русӣ"><i>русӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="англисӣ"><i>англисӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="испанӣ"><i>испанӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="шӯравӣ"><i>шӯравӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="тоҷикӣ"><i>тоҷикӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="руминӣ"><i>руминӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="аслӣ"><i>аслӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="марказӣ"><i>марказӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="қадимӣ"><i>қадимӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="кашоварзӣ"><i>кашоварзӣ</i><par n="русӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="будан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i/><par n="/будан__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="рафтан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>ра</i><par n="ра/фтан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="шудан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>ш</i><par n="ш/удан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="кардан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>к</i><par n="к/ардан__vbdo"/></e>
    <e lm="кандан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>кан</i><par n="кан/дан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ёфтан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>ё</i><par n="ё/фтан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="шустан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>шу</i><par n="ру/стан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="рустан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>ру</i><par n="ру/стан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="герефтан"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>г</i><par n="г/ерефтан__vblex"/></e>
